en: Cup Sleeves
xx: Cup Sleeves
cs: Návleky na hrníčky
da: Manchetter til kopper
de: Getränkebehälterhüllen
es: Aislantes térmicos para tazas
fr: Manchons pour gobelets
it: Portatazze
ja: カップ用スリーブ
nl: Bekerhouders
no: Koppomslag
pl: Pokrowce na filiżanki
pt: Porta-xícaras
ru: Чехлы для чашек
sv: Värmeskydd för koppar
tr: Fincan Kılıfları

en: Flasks
xx: Flasks
cs: Butylky
da: Flasker
de: Flachmänner
es: Frascos
fr: Flasques
it: Fiaschette
ja: スキットル
nl: Heupflessen
no: Lommeflasker
pl: Piersiówki
pt: Frascos
ru: Фляги
sv: Flaskor
tr: Alkollü İçki Mataraları

en: Insulated Bags
xx: Insulated Bags
cs: Termotašky
da: Frostposer
de: Kühltaschen
es: Bolsas aislantes
fr: Sacs isothermes
it: Borse isolate
ja: クーラーバッグ
nl: Koeltassen
no: Isolerte vesker
pl: Torby termoizolacyjne
pt: Sacos vedados
ru: Сумки с теплоизоляцией
sv: Isoleringspåsar
tr: Yalıtımlı Poşetler

en: Lunch Boxes & Totes
xx: Lunch Boxes & Totes
cs: Boxy a nosiče na oběd
da: Madkasser og -poser
de: Brotdosen & -taschen
es: Bolsas y contenedores para el almuerzo
fr: Sacs déjeuner et boîtes à repas
it: Borse e contenitori porta pranzo
ja: ランチボックス・ランチバッグ
nl: Broodtrommels en lunchtassen
no: Matbokser og handlevesker
pl: Pudełka i torebki na drugie śniadanie
pt: Lancheiras
ru: Сумки и коробки для завтрака
sv: Lunchlådor och lunchpåsar
tr: Yemek Kutu ve Çantaları

en: Picnic Baskets
xx: Picnic Baskets
cs: Piknikové koše
da: Picnickurve
de: Picknickkörbe
es: Cestas de picnic
fr: Paniers à pique-nique
it: Cesti da picnic
ja: ピクニックバスケット
nl: Picknickmanden
no: Piknikkurver
pl: Kosze piknikowe
pt: Cestas de piquenique
ru: Корзины для пикника
sv: Picknickkorgar
tr: Piknik Sepetleri

en: Replacement Drink Lids
xx: Replacement Drink Lids
cs: Náhradní víčka pro nádoby na nápoje
da: Låg til bægre
de: Getränkedeckel
es: Tapones de botellas
fr: Couvercles de rechange pour récipients à boisson
it: Tappi sostitutivi per bevande
ja: ドリンクカップ用フタ
nl: Vervangende drinkdeksels
no: Ekstra drikkelokk
pl: Pokrywki do pojemników na napoje
pt: Tampas para bebidas
ru: Многоразовые крышки для емкостей с напитками
sv: Ersättningslock till dryckeskärl
tr: Yedek İçecek Kapakları

en: Thermoses
xx: Thermoses
cs: Termosky
da: Termoflasker
de: Thermosflaschen
es: Termos
fr: Thermos
it: Thermos
ja: 真空断熱ボトル
nl: Thermosflessen
no: Termoser
pl: Termosy
pt: Garrafas térmicas
ru: Термосы
sv: Termosar
tr: Termoslar

en: Water Bottles
xx: Water Bottles
cs: Láhve na vodu
da: Vandflasker
de: Wasserflaschen
es: Botellas de agua
fr: Bouteilles d'eau
it: Bottiglie d'acqua
ja: 水筒
nl: Waterflessen
no: Vannflasker
pl: Butelki na wodę
pt: Garrafas de água
ru: Бутылки для воды
sv: Vattenflaskor
tr: Su Şişeleri

en: Wine Carrier Bags
xx: Wine Carrier Bags
cs: Tašky na víno
da: Bæretasker til vin
de: Weinflaschentaschen
es: Bolsas para transportar vino
fr: Sacs porte-bouteilles de vin
it: Borse per il trasporto di vino
ja: ワイン用バッグ
nl: Draagtassen voor wijnflessen
no: Vinbærevesker
pl: Torby na wino
pt: Bolsas de vinhos
ru: Сумки для переноски винных бутылок
sv: Väskor för vinflaskor
tr: Şarap Taşıma Çantaları

en: Food Storage
xx: Food Storage
cs: Skladování potravin
da: Madopbevaring
de: Essensaufbewahrung
es: Recipiente para comida
fr: Stockage des aliments
it: Dispenser per cibo
ja: 食品保存
nl: Voedsel bewaren
no: Matoppbevaring
pl: Przechowywanie żywności
pt: Armazenamento de alimentos
ru: Хранение продуктов
sv: Matförvaring
tr: Yiyecek Saklama

en: Bread Boxes & Bags
xx: Bread Boxes & Bags
cs: Chlebníky
da: Brødkasser og -poser
de: Brotkästen & -taschen
es: Paneras
fr: Boîtes à pain, Hûche à pain
it: Contenitori per pane
ja: ブレッドケース・パンケース
nl: Broodtrommels
no: Brødbokser og -poser
pl: Pojemniki i torby na chleb
pt: Caixas e sacos de pão
ru: Хлебницы и хлебные пакеты
sv: Brödlådor och brödpåsar
tr: Ekmek Kutuları ve Torbaları

en: Candy Buckets
xx: Candy Buckets
cs: Dózy na bonbóny
da: Slikspande
de: Nascheimer
es: Cubos de caramelos
fr: Seaux à confiseries
it: Secchielli per caramelle
ja: 飴入れ
nl: Snoeppotten
no: Godteribøtter
pl: Słoje na cukierki
pt: Baldes de doces
ru: Корзины для конфет
sv: Godishinkar
tr: Şeker Kaseleri

en: Cookie Jars
xx: Cookie Jars
cs: Dózy na sušenky
da: Kagedåser
de: Kecksdosen & -behälter
es: Botes de galletas
fr: Boîtes à biscuits
it: Biscottiere
ja: クッキージャー
nl: Koekjestrommels
no: Kakekrukker
pl: Słoje na ciastka
pt: Biscoteira
ru: Банки для печенья
sv: Kakburkar
tr: Kurabiye Kavanozları

en: Food Container Covers
xx: Food Container Covers
cs: Víka na nádoby
da: Låg til skåle
de: Lebensmittel-Abdeckhauben
es: Tapas para tuppers
fr: Couvercles pour récipients alimentaires
it: Coperchi per contenitori alimentari
ja: フードコンテナ・ボウル用フタ
nl: Deksels voor voedseldozen
no: Lokk til matbeholdere
pl: Pokrywki do pojemników na żywność
pt: Tapas de recipientes para alimentos
ru: Крышки контейнеров для хранения продуктов
sv: Skållock
tr: Yiyecek Kabı Kapakları

en: Food Storage Bags
xx: Food Storage Bags
cs: Pytlíky na potraviny
da: Madopbevaring – tasker
de: Frischhaltebeutel
es: Bolsas de comida
fr: Sacs de stockage des aliments
it: Borse conservazione cibo
ja: 食品保存袋
nl: Zakken voor voedselopslag
no: Matposer
pl: Torebki do przechowywania żywności
pt: Sacos para armazenamento de alimentos
ru: Пакеты для пищевых продуктов
sv: Matförvaringspåsar
tr: Yiyecek Saklama Poşetleri

en: Food Storage Containers
xx: Food Storage Containers
cs: Boxy na potraviny
da: Madopbevaring – beholdere
de: Lebensmittelbehälter
es: Fiambreras
fr: Conteneurs de stockage des aliments
it: Contenitori per cibo
ja: 食品保存容器
nl: Potten voor voedselopslag
no: Matbeholdere
pl: Pojemniki do przechowywania żywności
pt: Recipientes para armazenamento de alimentos
ru: Контейнеры для хранения продуктов
sv: Behållare för matförvaring
tr: Yiyecek Saklama Kapları

en: Food Wraps
xx: Food Wraps
cs: Obaly na potraviny
da: Indpakning til fødevarer
de: Lebensmittelverpackungsmaterial
es: Envoltorios de comida
fr: Emballages alimentaires
it: Imballaggi per alimenti
ja: 食品包装
nl: Plastic zakjes
no: Matinnpakning
pl: Zawijanie żywności
pt: Embalagens para alimentos
ru: Пищевая обертка
sv: Matfolie
tr: Yiyecek Ambalajları

en: Foil
xx: Foil
cs: Alobaly
da: Folie
de: Alufolien
es: Papel de aluminio
fr: Papier aluminium
it: Pellicola
ja: アルミホイル
nl: Folie
no: Folie
pl: Folia
pt: Papel alumínio
ru: Фольга
sv: Aluminiumfolie
tr: Folyo

en: Parchment Paper
xx: Parchment Paper
cs: Papír na pečení
da: Pergamentpapir
de: Pergamentpapier
es: Papel vegetal
fr: Papier cuisson
it: Carta pergamena
ja: クッキングシート
nl: Perkamentpapier
no: Bakepapir
pl: Papier do pieczenia
pt: Papel pergaminho
ru: Пергаментная бумага
sv: Bakplåtspapper
tr: Parşömen Kağıdı

en: Plastic Wrap
xx: Plastic Wrap
cs: Plastové obaly
da: Køkkenfilm
de: Frischhaltefolien
es: Film plástico
fr: Emballages plastiques
it: Imballaggi in plastica
ja: 食品用ラップフィルム
nl: Plasticfolie
no: Plastfolie
pl: Folia spożywcza
pt: Filme plástico para embalagem
ru: Пищевая пленка
sv: Plastfolie
tr: Plastik Ambalaj Kağıdı